apertium-lit.lit.dix
    <pardef n="vid/us__n_m">
      <e><p><l>aus</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ui</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ų</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uje</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>au</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>umi</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>us</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ų</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ums</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>us</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uose</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ūs</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>umis</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ūs</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
      
    <!-- Verbs -->      
    <pardef n="/būti__vbser">
      <e><p><l>esu</l><r>būti<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>esi</l><r>būti<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yra</l><r>būti<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>esame</l><r>būti<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>esate</l><r>būti<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>buvau</l><r>būti<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>buvai</l><r>būti<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>buvo</l><r>būti<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>buvome</l><r>būti<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>buvote</l><r>būti<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>būdavau</l><r>būti<s n="vbser"/><s n="pfi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>būdavai</l><r>būti<s n="vbser"/><s n="pfi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>būdavo</l><r>būti<s n="vbser"/><s n="pfi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>būdavome</l><r>būti<s n="vbser"/><s n="pfi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>būdavote</l><r>būti<s n="vbser"/><s n="pfi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
       
    <!-- Adjectives -->      
    <pardef n="ger/as__adj">       
    <!-- Positive degree, masculine -->
    <e><p><l>as</l><r>as<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>o</l><r>as<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>am</l><r>as<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ą</l><r>as<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>as<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ame</l><r>as<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>as<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ų</l><r>as<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iems</l><r>as<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>us</l><r>as<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ais</l><r>as<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uose</l><r>as<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
         
    <!-- Positive degree, feminine -->
    <e><p><l>a</l><r>as<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>os</l><r>as<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ai</l><r>as<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ą</l><r>as<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>as<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oje</l><r>as<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>os</l><r>as<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ų</l><r>as<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oms</l><r>as<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>as</l><r>as<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>omis</l><r>as<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ose</l><r>as<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
      
    <!-- Adverbs -->      
    <pardef n="taip__adv">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
      
    <pardef n="čia__adv">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
      
    <pardef n="kur__adv">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
      
    <pardef n="gilia/i__adv">
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>i<s n="adv"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>i<s n="adv"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>usiai</l><r>i<s n="adv"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
      
    <pardef n="grei/tai__adv">
      <e><p><l>tai</l><r>tai<s n="adv"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>čiau</l><r>tai<s n="adv"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>usiai</l><r>tai<s n="adv"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
      
    <pardef n="daug__adv">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="adv"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iau</l><r><s n="adv"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iausiai</l><r><s n="adv"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
         
    <!-- Conjunctions -->      
    <pardef n="ir__cnjcoo">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
      
    <!-- Prepositions -->      
    <pardef n="abipus__pr">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
   </pardefs>

    <e lm="anapus"><i>anapus</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="anot"><i>anot</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ant"><i>ant</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="arti"><i>arti</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="arčiau"><i>arčiau</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="aukščiau"><i>aukščiau</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="dėka"><i>dėka</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="greta"><i>greta</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="įkypai"><i>įkypai</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="iš"><i>iš</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="kiaurai"><i>kiaurai</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="lig"><i>lig</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="link"><i>link</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="nuo"><i>nuo</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pirma"><i>pirma</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="po"><i>po</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pusiau"><i>pusiau</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="skradžiai"><i>skradžiai</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="šiapus"><i>šiapus</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="už"><i>už</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="vidury"><i>vidury</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="virš"><i>virš</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="viršum"><i>viršum</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="apie"><i>apie</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="į"><i>į</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="įstrižai"><i>įstrižai</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="kiaurai"><i>kiaurai</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="palei"><i>palei</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="paskui"><i>paskui</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="po"><i>po</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="priešais"><i>priešais</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="skradžiai"><i>skradžiai</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="už"><i>už</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="su"><i>su</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ties"><i>ties</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ir"><i>ir</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="bei"><i>bei</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="bet"><i>bet</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="o"><i>o</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="tačiau"><i>tačiau</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="kad"><i>kad</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="jog"><i>jog</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="kai"><i>kai</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="kol"><i>kol</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="jei"><i>jei</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="jeigu"><i>jeigu</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="nes"><i>nes</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="kadangi"><i>kadangi</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="kaip"><i>kaip</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="nors"><i>nors</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ar"><i>ar</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="arba"><i>arba</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="dar"><i>dar</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="būti"><i/><par n="/būti__vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="taip"><i>taip</i><par n="taip__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ne"><i>ne</i><par n="taip__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="kur"><i>kur</i><par n="kur__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="kodel"><i>kodel</i><par n="kur__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="tai"><i>tai</i><par n="čia__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="va"><i>va</i><par n="čia__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="čia"><i>čia</i><par n="čia__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ten"><i>ten</i><par n="čia__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="arti"><i>arti</i><par n="čia__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="dar"><i>dar</i><par n="čia__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="aklai"><i>aklai</i><par n="čia__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="deja"><i>deja</i><par n="čia__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="maždaug"><i>maždaug</i><par n="čia__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="kasdien"><i>kasdien</i><par n="čia__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="nėmaž"><i>nėmaž</i><par n="čia__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="staiga"><i>staiga</i><par n="čia__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="tik"><i>tik</i><par n="čia__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ką tik"><i>ką<b/>tik</i><par n="čia__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="tiesiog"><i>tiesiog</i><par n="čia__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="daug"><i>daug</i><par n="daug__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ypač"><i>ypač</i><par n="daug__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="giliai"><i>gilia</i><par n="gilia/i__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="blogai"><i>bloga</i><par n="gilia/i__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="dažnai"><i>dažna</i><par n="gilia/i__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="dieviškai"><i>dieviška</i><par n="gilia/i__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="gerai"><i>gera</i><par n="gilia/i__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="gražiai"><i>gražia</i><par n="gilia/i__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="išdaigiai"><i>išdaigia</i><par n="gilia/i__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="iškalbiai"><i>iškalbia</i><par n="gilia/i__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="meniškai"><i>meniška</i><par n="gilia/i__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="labai"><i>laba</i><par n="gilia/i__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="laisvai"><i>laisva</i><par n="gilia/i__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="lengvai"><i>lengva</i><par n="gilia/i__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="mielai"><i>miela</i><par n="gilia/i__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="mįslingai"><i>mįslinga</i><par n="gilia/i__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="neramiai"><i>neramia</i><par n="gilia/i__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="netvarkingai"><i>netvarkinga</i><par n="gilia/i__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="paslaptingai"><i>paslaptinga</i><par n="gilia/i__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="patraukliai"><i>patrauklia</i><par n="gilia/i__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="saugiai"><i>saugia</i><par n="gilia/i__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="greitai"><i>grei</i><par n="grei/tai__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="vidus"><i>vid</i><par n="vid/us__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="geras"><i>ger</i><par n="ger/as__adj"/></e>
